Missouri, session 2026, SB839.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 162.083, 162.221, 162.223, 162.241,
162.261, 162.291, 162.301, 162.341, 162.431, 162.459, 162.471,
162.481, 162.492, 162.563, 162.601, 162.821, 162.825, 162.865,
162.867, and 162.910, RSMo, are repealed and twenty-one new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
162.082, 162.083, 162.221, 162.223, 162.241, 162.261, 162.291,
162.301, 162.341, 162.431, 162.459, 162.471, 162.481, 162.492,
162.563, 162.601, 162.821, 162.825, 162.865, 162.867, and
162.910, to read as follows:
162.082. 1. Elections for all school board members
shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in
November of even-numbered years, and the term of every
school board member elected in 2028 and every year
thereafter shall be four years, except as specifically
provided in other sections.
2. Any school board member whose term expires prior to
the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of 2028
or in any other odd-numbered year thereafter shall continue
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 839 2
to serve until his or her successor is duly elected and
qualified at the next general election.
3. In an even-numbered year, the number of school
board seats to be elected shall be equal to those with terms
that would have expired in the previous odd-numbered year
and those with terms expiring in such even-numbered year.
Except as specifically provided in other sections, the
candidates in each school board election receiving the
highest number of votes shall be elected for terms of four
years.
4. As used in this chapter, "school board member
election" or "school board election" means the election held
on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November in
even-numbered years starting in 2028.
5. (1) Each declaration of candidacy for school board
member shall state the candidate's full name, residence
address, office for which such candidate proposes to be a
candidate, the party ticket on which he or she wishes to be
a candidate, and that if elected he or she will qualify.
The declaration shall be in substantially the following form:
I, ______, a resident and registered voter of the
county of ______ and the state of Missouri, residing
at ______, do announce myself a candidate for the
office of ______ on the ______ party ticket, to be
voted for at the ___________ election to be held on
the ______ day of ______, ______, and I further
declare that if elected to such office I will
qualify.
_______________________
Signature of candidate Subscribed and sworn to
before me this______ day
______ of, ______

SB 839 3
_______________________ _______________________
Residence address Signature of election
official or other officer
authorized to administer
oaths
_______________________
Mailing address (if different)
_______________________
Telephone Number (Optional)
(2) If the declaration is to be filed in person, it
shall be subscribed and sworn to by the candidate before an
official authorized to accept his or her declaration of
candidacy. If the declaration is to be filed by certified
mail or any other means, it shall be subscribed and sworn to
by the candidate before a notary public or other officer
authorized by law to administer oaths.
(3) Political parties and groups of voters may
nominate candidates for school board member in the manner
provided by sections 115.307 to 115.405 and in no other
manner.
162.083. 1. The state board of education may appoint
additional members to any special administrative board
appointed under section 162.081.
2. The state board of education may set a final term
of office for any member of a special administrative board,
after which a successor member shall be elected by the
voters of the district.

SB 839 4
(1) All final terms of office for members of the
special administrative board established under this section
shall expire on June thirtieth.
(2) The election of a successor member shall occur on
the [general municipal election day] first Tuesday after the
first Monday in November of the even-numbered year
immediately prior to the expiration of the final term of
office.
(3) The election shall be conducted in a manner
consistent with the election laws applicable to the school
district.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
barring an otherwise qualified member of the special
administrative board from standing for an elected term on
the board.
4. On a date set by the state board of education, any
district operating under the governance of a special
administrative board shall return to local governance, and
continue operation as a school district as otherwise
authorized by law.
162.221. 1. When the voters of any one or more
districts as authorized in section 162.211, except those
districts designated in subdivision (2) thereof, desire to
form a seven-director district, a petition signed by at
least ten percent in number of those voting for school board
members in the last [annual] school election in each
district or one hundred voters, whichever is the higher
number, shall be filed with the state board of education.
On receipt of the petition, a representative of the state
department of education, designated by the commissioner of
education, shall visit the districts and determine the exact
boundaries of the proposed seven-director district. In

SB 839 5
determining these boundaries, he shall so locate the
boundary lines as will in his judgment form the best
possible seven-director district, having due regard also to
the welfare of adjoining districts.
2. Within sixty days after the receipt of the
petition, the commissioner of education shall submit the
question to the voters of the proposed district. The notice
shall include a statement of the purpose together with a
plat of the proposed district. The state commissioner shall
file a copy of the petition and of the plat with the county
clerk. The election shall be conducted in the manner
provided in section 162.191.
162.223. 1. When the voters in any two or more
adjacent districts without limitation as to size or
enrollment desire to consolidate and form a new district, a
petition asking for an election upon the question of
consolidation shall be filed with the boards of education of
the affected districts; provided, however, that such
petition shall be signed by ten percent of those in each
district who voted for school directors at the last election
in which such directors were elected, or one hundred voters,
whichever is the higher number.
2. As an alternative to the procedure in subsection 1
of this section, two or more adjacent districts may, by a
majority vote of each board of education, call for an
election upon the question of consolidation.
3. The question shall be submitted in substantially
the following form:
Shall the ______ school district and the ______
school district (and the ______ school district)
form a new district with a tax rate ceiling of
______ per one hundred dollars of assessed

SB 839 6
valuation? If this proposition is approved, the
adjusted operating levy of the new school
district is estimated to be ______ (amount) per
one hundred dollars of assessed valuation.
4. The board of directors of each affected district
shall cause the question to be included on the ballot to be
submitted to the voters in each such district at the next
election day. A plat of the proposed new district shall be
published and posted with the notices of election.
5. The results of the voting on the proposal in each
district affected shall be certified to the state
commissioner of education by the secretary of each board of
education of each district or by such other person or body
charged with conducting such elections and, should the
majority of the votes cast in each affected district be in
favor of the proposal, the state commissioner shall declare
the new district formed as of July first following the
submission of the question.
6. If the commissioner of education declares, before
the closing date for filing for the election of board
members [on the municipal election date], that the new
district is to be formed as of July first, no candidates
shall be certified by the districts involved in the
consolidation and the board members whose terms would
otherwise have expired on that date shall remain as board
members until July first. In consolidation cases where
there is insufficient time from the date the commissioner of
education declares that the new district shall be formed as
of July first and July first to hold an election of board
members, seven board members from the boards of the
consolidating districts shall be drawn by lot to serve until
the next election at which the new board of education can be

SB 839 7
elected. The number of board members selected from one
district shall not exceed the quotient resulting from seven
divided by the number of districts consolidating rounded
down to the nearest whole number plus one. The commissioner
of education or a designee shall supervise the drawing, by
lot, of the board members which shall be approved by the
state board of education.
162.241. If a proposal to form a district pursuant to
the provisions of sections 162.171 to 162.191, 162.211 and
162.221, or section 162.223 receives the required majority
of the votes cast on the proposition, the state board of
education or the county commission, in the case of a
district formed pursuant to the provisions of sections
162.171 to 162.191 or 162.211 and 162.221, shall order an
election in the district to be held. This election shall be
for the purpose of electing seven members to serve on the
school board of the district. Such election shall be held
on the [next election day as provided under section 115.123]
first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of an even-
numbered year. The election shall be conducted in the
manner provided by section 162.371. A letter from the
commissioner of education, delivered by certified mail to
the presiding commissioner of the county commission of the
county to which the district formed by provisions of section
162.223 is assigned shall be the authority for the county
commission to proceed with election procedures in the same
manner as they would be performed by the district board of
education were it in existence; but the costs of the
election shall be paid from the incidental fund of the new
district. [Two] Three directors shall be elected to serve
[until the next municipal election] two-year terms, two to
serve [until the second municipal election] four-year terms,

SB 839 8
and two to serve [until the third municipal election. The
seventh board member shall be elected to serve until the
municipal election during which the majority of school
districts elect three board members] six-year terms. Any
director elected after this initial election shall serve a
four-year term.
162.261. 1. The government and control of a seven-
director school district, other than an urban district, is
vested in a board of education of seven members, who hold
their office for [three] four years, except as provided in
sections 162.241 and 162.563, and until their successors are
duly elected and qualified. Any vacancy occurring in the
board shall be filled by the remaining members of the board;
except that if there are more than two vacancies at any one
time, the county commission upon receiving written notice of
the vacancies shall fill the vacancies by appointment. If
there are more than two vacancies at any one time in a
county without a county commission, the county executive
upon receiving written notice of the vacancies shall fill
the vacancies, with the advice and consent of the county
council, by appointment. The person appointed shall hold
office until the next [municipal] election, when a director
shall be elected for the unexpired term.
2. No seven-director, urban, or metropolitan school
district board of education shall hire a spouse of any
member of such board for a vacant or newly created position
unless the position has been advertised pursuant to board
policy and the superintendent of schools submits a written
recommendation for the employment of the spouse to the board
of education. The names of all applicants as well as the
name of the applicant hired for the position shall be
included in the board minutes.

SB 839 9
3. The provisions of Article VII, Section 6 of the
Missouri Constitution apply to school districts.
162.291. Except as provided in section 162.563, the
voters of each seven-director district other than urban
districts shall, [at municipal elections] on the first
Tuesday after the first Monday in November of even-numbered
years, elect [two] directors, who are citizens of the United
States and resident taxpayers of the district, [who] in
accordance with the provisions of section 162.082. Such
directors shall have resided in the district for one year
next preceding their election or appointment, and [who are]
be at least twenty-four years of age.
162.301. 1. Within fourteen days after the election
of the first school board in each seven-director district,
other than an urban district, and within fourteen days after
each [annual] election, the board shall meet. The newly
elected members shall qualify by taking the oath of office
prescribed by Article VII, Section 11, of the Constitution
of Missouri.
2. The board shall organize by the election of a
president and vice president, and the board shall, on or
before the fifteenth day of [July of each year] January in
odd-numbered years, elect a secretary and a treasurer, who
shall enter upon their respective duties on the fifteenth
day of [July] January. The secretary and treasurer may be
or may not be members of the board. No compensation shall
be granted to either the secretary or the treasurer until
his report and settlement are made and filed or published as
the law directs.
3. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for
the transaction of business, but no contract shall be let,

SB 839 10
person employed, bill approved or warrant ordered unless a
majority of the whole board votes therefor.
162.341. The [annual] school board member election in
seven-director districts[, except urban districts,] shall be
held on [municipal election days] the first Tuesday after
the first Monday in November of even-numbered years.
162.431. 1. When it is necessary to change the
boundary lines between seven-director school districts, in
each district affected, ten percent of the voters by number
of those voting for school board members in the last
[annual] school election in each district may petition the
district boards of education in the districts affected,
regardless of county lines, for a change in boundaries. The
question shall be submitted at the next election, as the
term election is referenced and defined in section 115.123.
2. The voters shall decide the question by a majority
vote of those who vote upon the question. If assent to the
change is given by each of the various districts voting,
each voting separately, the boundaries are changed from that
date.
3. If one of the districts votes against the change
and the other votes for the change, the matter may be
appealed to the state board of education, in writing, within
fifteen days of the submission of the question by either one
of the districts affected, or in the above event by a
majority of the signers of the petition requesting a vote on
the proposal. At the first meeting of the state board
following the appeal, a board of arbitration composed of
three members, none of whom shall be a resident of any
district affected, shall be appointed. In determining
whether it is necessary to change the boundary line between

SB 839 11
seven-director districts, the board of arbitration shall
base its decision upon the following:
(1) The presence of school-aged children in the
affected area;
(2) The presence of actual educational harm to school-
aged children, either due to a significant difference in the
time involved in transporting students or educational
deficiencies in the district which would have its boundary
adversely affected; and
(3) The presence of an educational necessity, not of a
commercial benefit to landowners or to the district
benefitting for the proposed boundary adjustment.
For purposes of subdivision (2) of this subsection,
"significant difference in the time involved in transporting
students" shall mean a difference of forty-five minutes or
more per trip in travel time. "Travel time" is the period
of time required to transport a pupil from the pupil's place
of residence or other designated pick-up point to the site
of the pupil's educational placement.
4. Within twenty days after notification of
appointment, the board of arbitration shall meet and
consider the necessity for the proposed changes and shall
decide whether the boundaries shall be changed as requested
in the petition or be left unchanged, which decision shall
be final. The decision by the board of arbitration shall be
rendered not more than thirty days after the matter is
referred to the board. The chairman of the board of
arbitration shall transmit the decision to the secretary of
each district affected who shall enter the same upon the
records of his district and the boundaries shall thereafter
be in accordance with the decision of the board of

SB 839 12
arbitration. The members of the board of arbitration shall
be allowed a fee of fifty dollars each, to be paid at the
time the appeal is made by the district taking the appeal or
by the petitioners should they institute the appeal.
5. If the board of arbitration decides that the
boundaries shall be left unchanged, no new petition for the
same, or substantially the same, boundary change between the
same districts shall be filed until after the expiration of
two years from the date of the municipal election at which
the question was submitted to the voters of the districts.
162.459. 1. Notwithstanding other provisions of law
to the contrary, the school board of each school district
designated in the statutes as a seven-director or urban
school district shall consist of seven members. [At the
first election for members of the school board in each of
such districts after January 1, 1993, and each three years
thereafter, three members of the school board shall be
elected; except, no school district composed of seven
members as of January 1, 1993, shall be required to modify
its schedule of electing board members] For all board
members serving terms as of January 1, 2028, such terms
shall be modified in accordance with the provisions of
section 162.082. The term of every board member elected in
2028 or thereafter shall be four years.
2. Provisions of law applicable to seven-director and
urban school districts, except those which conflict with the
provisions of this section, shall apply to and govern the
school districts designated in subsection 1 of this section.
162.471. 1. The government and control of an urban
school district is vested in a board of seven directors.
2. Except as provided in section 162.563, each
director shall be a voter of the district who has resided

SB 839 13
within this state for one year next preceding the director's
election or appointment and who is at least twenty-four
years of age. All directors elected in 2028 or thereafter,
except as otherwise provided in sections 162.481, 162.492,
and 162.563, shall hold their offices for [six] four years
and until their successors are duly elected and qualified.
The term of any board member serving a six-year term as of
January 1, 2028, shall be modified in accordance with the
provisions of section 162.082. All vacancies occurring in
the board shall be filled by appointment by the board as
soon as practicable, and the person appointed shall hold
office until the next school board election, when a
successor shall be elected for the remainder of the
unexpired term. The power of the board to perform any
official duty during the existence of a vacancy continues
unimpaired thereby.
162.481. 1. Except as otherwise provided in [this
section and] sections 162.492 and 162.563, all elections of
school directors in urban school districts shall be held
biennially [at the same times and places as municipal
elections] on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in
November of even-numbered years.
2. [Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3, 4,
and 5 of this section, hereafter] When a seven-director
district becomes an urban school district, the directors of
the prior seven-director district shall continue as
directors of the urban school district until the expiration
of the terms for which they were elected and until their
successors are elected as provided in this subsection. The
first biennial school election for directors shall be held
in the urban school district at the time provided in
subsection 1 of this section which is on the date of or

SB 839 14
subsequent to the expiration of the terms of the directors
of the prior district which are first to expire, and
directors shall be elected to succeed the directors of the
prior district whose terms have expired. If the terms of
two directors only have expired, the directors elected at
the first biennial school election in the urban school
district shall be elected for terms of six years. If the
terms of four directors have expired, two directors shall be
elected for terms of six years and two shall be elected for
terms of four years. At the next succeeding biennial
election held in the urban school district, successors for
the remaining directors of the prior seven-director district
shall be elected. If only two directors are to be elected
they shall be elected for terms of six years each. If four
directors are to be elected, two shall be elected for terms
of six years and two shall be elected for terms of two
years. After seven directors of the urban school district
have been elected under this subsection, their successors
shall be elected for terms of [six] four years.
[3. In any school district in which a majority of the
district is located in any home rule city with more than one
hundred fifty-five thousand but fewer than two hundred
thousand inhabitants, elections shall be held annually at
the same times and places as general municipal elections for
all years where one or more terms expire, and the terms
shall be for three years and until their successors are duly
elected and qualified for all directors elected on and after
August 28, 1998.
4. For any school district which becomes an urban
school district by reason of the 2000 federal decennial
census, elections shall be held annually at the same times
and places as general municipal elections for all years

SB 839 15
where one or more terms expire , and the terms shall be for
three years and until their successors are duly elected and
qualified for all directors elected on and after August 28,
2001 .
5. In any school district in any county with a
charter form of government and with more than three hundred
thousand but fewer than four hundred fifty thousand
inhabitants which becomes an urban school district by reason
of the 2010 federal decennial census, elections shall be
held annually at the same times and places as general
municipal elections for all years where one or more terms
expire, and the terms shall be for three years and until
their successors are duly elected and qualified for all
directors elected on and after April 2, 2012.
6. In any urban school district in a county of the
first classification with more than eighty-three thousand
but fewer than ninety-two thousand inhabitants and with a
home rule city with more than seventy-six thousand but fewer
than ninety-one thousand inhabitants as the county seat,
elections shall be held annually at the same times and
places as general municipal elections for all years where
one or more terms expire, and upon expiration of any term
after August 28, 2015, the term of office shall be for three
years and until their successors are duly elected and
qualified.]
162.492. 1. In all urban districts containing the
greater part of the population of a city which has more than
three hundred thousand inhabitants, the election authority
of the city in which the greater portion of the school
district lies, and of the county if the district includes
territory not within the city limits, shall serve ex officio
as a redistricting commission. The commission shall on or

SB 839 16
before November 1, 2018, divide the school district into
five subdistricts, all subdistricts being of compact and
contiguous territory and as nearly equal in the number of
inhabitants as practicable and thereafter the board shall
redistrict the district into subdivisions as soon as
practicable after each United States decennial census. In
establishing the subdistricts each member shall have one
vote and a majority vote of the total membership of the
commission is required to make effective any action of the
commission.
2. School board elections for the election of
directors shall be held on municipal election days in 2014
and 2016. At the election in 2014, directors shall be
elected to hold office until 2019 and until their successors
are elected and qualified. At the election in 2016,
directors shall be elected until 2019 and until their
successors are elected and qualified. Beginning in [2019]
2028, school elections for the election of directors shall
be held on the [local election date as specified in the
charter of a home rule city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county]
first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of even-
numbered years. The terms of board members described in
this subsection shall be modified in accordance with the
provisions of section 162.082. Beginning at the election
for school directors in 2019, the number of directors on the
board shall be reduced from nine to seven. Two directors
shall be at-large directors and five directors shall
represent the subdistricts, with one director from each of
the subdistricts. At the 2019 election, one of the at-large
directors and the directors from subdistricts one, three,
and five shall be elected for a two-year term, and the other

SB 839 17
at-large director and the directors from subdistricts two
and four shall be elected for a four-year term. Thereafter,
all seven directors shall serve a four-year term. Directors
shall serve until the next election and until their
successors, then elected, are duly qualified as provided in
this section. In addition to other qualifications
prescribed by law, each member elected from a subdistrict
shall be a resident of the subdistrict from which he or she
is elected. The subdistricts shall be numbered from one to
five.
3. The five candidates, one from each of the
subdistricts, who receive a plurality of the votes cast by
the voters of that subdistrict and the at-large candidates
receiving a plurality of the at-large votes shall be
elected. The name of no candidate for nomination shall be
printed on the ballot unless the candidate has at least
sixty days prior to the election filed a declaration of
candidacy with the secretary of the board of directors
containing the signatures of at least two hundred fifty
registered voters who are residents of the subdistrict
within which the candidate for nomination to a subdistrict
office resides, and in case of at-large candidates the
signatures of at least five hundred registered voters. The
election authority shall determine the validity of all
signatures on declarations of candidacy.
4. In any election either for at-large candidates or
candidates elected by the voters of subdistricts, if there
are more than two candidates, a majority of the votes are
not required to elect but the candidate having a plurality
of the votes shall be elected.
5. The names of all candidates shall appear upon the
ballot without party designation and in the order of the

SB 839 18
priority of the times of filing their petitions of
nomination. No candidate may file both at large and from a
subdistrict and the names of all candidates shall appear
only once on the ballot, nor may any candidate file more
than one declaration of candidacy. All declarations shall
designate the candidate's residence and whether the
candidate is filing at large or from a subdistrict and the
numerical designation of the subdistrict or at-large area.
6. The provisions of all sections relating to seven-
director school districts shall also apply to and govern
urban districts in cities of more than three hundred
thousand inhabitants, to the extent applicable and not in
conflict with the provisions of those sections specifically
relating to such urban districts.
7. Vacancies which occur on the school board shall be
filled in the manner provided in section 162.471.
162.563. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "School board", the board vested with the
government and control of a school district as described in
section 162.261 or section 162.471;
(2) "School district", a seven-director school
district or an urban school district established in this
chapter.
2. A school board may divide the school district into
seven subdistricts or a combination of subdistricts and at-
large districts and establish the election of school board
members as provided in this section.
3. (1) A school board desiring to divide a school
district as provided in this section shall vote on the
question of dividing the district as provided in this
section. Upon the approval of the question by at least four

SB 839 19
members of the school board, the school board shall develop
a proposed plan as described in subdivision (2) of this
subsection.
(2) A school board dividing a school district as
provided in this section shall develop and adopt a proposed
plan for the division of the school district. Such proposed
plan shall be adopted upon the approval of at least four
members of the school board and shall contain at least the
following information:
(a) A summary of the proposed plan for dividing the
school district;
(b) A statement indicating whether the school district
will be divided into seven subdistricts or a combination of
subdistricts and at-large districts;
(c) A description of the areas of the school district
each newly elected school board member will represent, with
each subdistrict and at-large district represented by a
number;
(d) A statement indicating whether the existing school
board members will be replaced by the newly elected school
board members at one election or in succeeding elections to
provide for staggered terms of the members; and
(e) Any other information deemed necessary by the
school board.
(3) After the school board develops such proposed
plan, the school board shall immediately notify the election
authority of the county in which the school district is
located. Upon receiving such notification, the election
authority shall submit the question of whether to divide the
school district as described in the proposed plan to the
voters of the school district on the next available day for
any municipal election. If a majority of the registered

SB 839 20
voters of the school district voting on the question approve
the division of the school district, the school board shall
follow the procedures described in subsection 4 of this
section. If a majority of the registered voters of the
school district voting on the question reject the division
of the school district, no division as described in this
section shall occur.
4. (1) After approval of a question submitted under
subdivision (3) of subsection 3 of this section, a school
board dividing a school district as provided in this section
shall adopt a final plan for the division of the school
district based on the proposed plan developed under
subsection 3 of this section. Such final plan shall contain
at least the following information:
(a) A summary of the proposed plan for dividing the
school district;
(b) The time and place of at least two public hearings
to be held to consider the proposed plan;
(c) A statement indicating whether the school district
will be divided into seven subdistricts or a combination of
subdistricts and at-large districts;
(d) A description of the areas of the school district
each newly elected school board member will represent, with
each subdistrict and at-large district represented by a
number;
(e) A statement indicating whether the existing school
board members will be replaced by the newly elected school
board members at one election or in succeeding elections to
provide for staggered terms of the members; and
(f) Any other information deemed necessary by the
school board.

SB 839 21
(2) For each hearing held as provided in this
subsection, the school board shall:
(a) Publish notice of the hearing, the proposed plan,
and any amendments to the proposed plan adopted at a
previous hearing on the school district's website and by any
other method allowed by law, with the first publication to
occur no more than thirty days before the hearing and the
second publication to occur no earlier than fifteen days and
no later than ten days before the hearing;
(b) Hear all alternate proposals for division of the
school district and receive evidence for or against such
alternate proposals;
(c) Hear all protests and receive evidence for or
against such proposed division;
(d) Vote on each alternate proposal and protest, which
vote shall be the final determination of such alternate
proposal or protest;
(e) Adopt any amendments to the proposed plan; and
(f) Perform any other actions related to the proposed
plan deemed necessary by the school board.
100 (3) (a) After the conclusion of the final hearing
101 proceedings but before adjourning such hearing, the school
102 board shall adopt the final plan to divide the school
103 district developed as a result of the hearings.
104 (b) After the school board adopts the final plan, the
105 school board shall present the final plan to the election
106 authority of the county in which the school district is
107 located for actions required under subdivision (4) of this
108 subsection and publish the final plan in the same manner as
109 the initial proposed plan was published under paragraph (a)
110 of subdivision (2) of this subsection. The final plan shall
111 contain at least the following information:

SB 839 22
112 a. A summary of the final plan for dividing the school
113 district;
114 b. A statement indicating whether the school district
115 will be divided into seven subdistricts or a combination of
116 subdistricts and at-large districts;
117 c. A description of the areas of the school district
118 each newly elected school board member will represent, with
119 each subdistrict and at-large district represented by a
120 number;
121 d. The date of the election of each new school board
122 member as provided in [the final plan] section 162.082;
123 e. A statement indicating whether the existing school
124 board members will be replaced by the newly elected school
125 board members at one election or in succeeding elections to
126 provide for staggered terms of the members; and
127 f. Any other information deemed necessary by the
128 school board.
129 (4) (a) After a final plan is adopted as provided in
130 subdivision (3) of this subsection, before December first of
131 the calendar year immediately preceding the general
132 municipal election day in the calendar year in which the
133 residents of the school district will vote to elect new
134 school board members as provided in the final plan, the
135 school board shall divide the school district into seven
136 subdistricts or a combination of subdistricts and at-large
137 districts as directed in the final plan. All subdistricts
138 required by the final plan shall be of contiguous and
139 compact territory and as nearly equal in population as
140 practicable in accordance with the final plan. Within six
141 months after each decennial census is reported to the
142 President of the United States, the school board shall
143 reapportion the subdistricts to be as nearly equal in

SB 839 23
144 population as practicable. After the school board divides
145 the school district or reapportions the subdistricts, the
146 school board shall notify the residents of the school
147 district as provided by law.
148 (b) Any resident of the school district who believes
149 the school board has divided the school district or
150 reapportioned subdistricts in violation of paragraph (a) of
151 this subdivision may petition the circuit court of the
152 county in which the school district exists for an order
153 directing the school board to divide the school district or
154 reapportion the subdistricts as provided in paragraph (a) of
155 this subdivision. The petition shall be submitted to the
156 circuit court within ten business days of the school board's
157 notice required in paragraph (a) of this subdivision.
158 (5) On the first day available for candidate filing
159 for the first general municipal election occurring after the
160 school district is divided as provided in this subsection,
161 any qualified resident who has or will have resided in a
162 subdistrict or at-large district for the year immediately
163 preceding the general municipal election day may file as a
164 candidate for election to the school board as a member
165 representing such subdistrict or at-large district. At the
166 end of the time available for candidate filing, if no
167 qualified resident of a subdistrict has filed as a candidate
168 in that subdistrict, the election authority shall extend the
169 time for candidate filing by seven additional days, and any
170 qualified resident of the school district who has or will
171 have resided in the school district for the year immediately
172 preceding the general municipal election day may file as a
173 candidate for election to the school board as a member
174 representing that subdistrict. No school district shall
175 require a candidate to submit a petition signed by the

SB 839 24
176 registered voters of the school district as a method of
177 filing a declaration of candidacy. The election authority
178 shall determine the validity of all declarations of
179 candidacy.
180 (6) When the election is held [on the general
181 municipal election day], the seven candidates, one from each
182 of the subdistricts or at-large districts, who receive a
183 plurality of the votes cast by the voters of that
184 subdistrict or at-large district shall be elected. Any
185 candidate who is not a subdistrict resident but qualifies as
186 a candidate as a school district resident as provided in
187 subdivision (5) of this subsection shall be elected by the
188 voters of the school district. Each member shall be elected
189 to a term as provided in the final plan adopted as provided
190 in subdivision (3) of this subsection.
191 (7) Each member shall serve until a successor is
192 elected or the member vacates the office. Any vacancy that
193 occurs before the end of the member's term shall be filled
194 as provided in section 162.261 or 162.471.
195 (8) Except for a member who is not a subdistrict
196 resident but is elected as a school district resident to
197 represent a subdistrict as provided in subdivision (5) of
198 this subsection, each member shall reside in the subdistrict
199 the member represents during the member's term.
200 (9) All other provisions applicable to school
201 districts that are not in conflict with this subsection
202 shall apply to school districts divided as provided in this
203 subsection.
204 5. (1) If any school district receives a petition,
205 signed by at least ten percent of the number of registered
206 voters of the school district voting in the last school
207 board election, calling for the school district to divide

SB 839 25
208 into seven subdistricts or a combination of subdistricts and
209 at-large districts and establish the election of school
210 board members as provided in this subsection, the school
211 district shall immediately notify the election authority of
212 the county in which the school district is located. Upon
213 receiving such notification, the election authority shall
214 submit the question of whether to divide the school district
215 as provided by the petition to the voters of the school
216 district on the next available day for any municipal
217 election. If a majority of the registered voters of the
218 school district voting on the question approve the division
219 of the school district, the school board shall begin the
220 process of adopting the plan as described in this
221 subsection. If a majority of the registered voters of the
222 school district voting on the question reject the division
223 of the school district, no division as described in the
224 petition shall occur.
225 (2) (a) Any such petition submitted to the school
226 district as provided in this subsection shall contain a
227 proposed plan for the division of the school district. Such
228 proposed plan shall contain at least the following
229 information:
230 a. A summary of the proposed plan for dividing the
231 school district;
232 b. A statement indicating whether the school district
233 will be divided into seven subdistricts or a combination of
234 subdistricts and at-large districts;
235 c. A description of the areas of the school district
236 each newly elected school board member will represent, with
237 each subdistrict and at-large district represented by a
238 number;

SB 839 26
239 d. The proposed date of the election of each new
240 school board member as provided in the proposed plan;
241 e. A statement indicating whether the existing school
242 board members will be replaced by the newly elected school
243 board members at one election or in succeeding elections to
244 provide for staggered terms of the members; and
245 f. Any other information deemed necessary by the
246 school board.
247 (b) If a division of the school district is approved
248 by the voters as provided in subdivision (1) of this
249 subsection, the school board shall create a school district
250 division commission to develop a final plan for division of
251 the school district. The commission shall:
252 a. Be composed of nine members as follows:
253 (i) Three members appointed by the superintendent of
254 the school district;
255 (ii) Three members appointed by the county commission;
256 and
257 (iii) Three members appointed by the organizers of the
258 petition to divide the school district; and
259 b. Set the time and place of at least two hearings to
260 be held to consider the proposed plan. For each hearing
261 held, the commission shall:
262 (i) Publish notice of the hearing, the proposed plan,
263 and any amendments to the proposed plan adopted at a
264 previous hearing on the school district's website and by any
265 other method allowed by law, with the first publication to
266 occur no more than thirty days before the hearing and the
267 second publication to occur no earlier than fifteen days and
268 no later than ten days before the hearing;
269 (ii) Conduct the hearing on the proposal for division
270 of the district on behalf of the petitioners;

SB 839 27
271 (iii) Hear all protests and receive evidence for or
272 against such proposed division; and
273 (iv) Vote to adopt any proposed plan amendments agreed
274 to by the petitioners as a result of the hearings.
275 (c) Within ninety days after the adjournment of the
276 final hearing conducted as provided in this subdivision, the
277 commission shall submit the final plan to the election
278 authority of the county in which the school district is
279 located for actions required in subdivision (3) of this
280 subsection and publish the final plan in the same manner as
281 the initial proposed plan was published as provided in item
282 (i) of subparagraph b. of paragraph (b) of this
283 subdivision. The final plan shall contain at least the
284 following information:
285 a. A summary of the final plan for dividing the school
286 district;
287 b. A statement indicating whether the school district
288 will be divided into seven subdistricts or a combination of
289 subdistricts and at-large districts;
290 c. A description of the areas of the school district
291 each newly elected school board member will represent, with
292 each subdistrict and at-large district represented by a
293 number;
294 d. The date of the election of each new school board
295 member as provided in the final plan;
296 e. A statement indicating whether the existing school
297 board members will be replaced by the newly elected school
298 board members at one election or in succeeding elections to
299 provide for staggered terms of the members; and
300 f. Any other information deemed necessary by the
301 commission.

SB 839 28
302 (3) (a) After a final plan is submitted to the
303 election authority as provided in subdivision (2) of this
304 subsection, before December first of the calendar year
305 immediately preceding the general municipal election day in
306 the calendar year in which the residents of the school
307 district will vote to elect new school board members as
308 provided in the final plan, the school district division
309 commission shall divide the school district into seven
310 subdistricts or a combination of subdistricts and at-large
311 districts as directed in the final plan. All subdistricts
312 required by the final plan shall be of contiguous and
313 compact territory and as nearly equal in population as
314 practicable in accordance with the final plan. Within six
315 months after each decennial census is reported to the
316 President of the United States, the commission shall
317 reapportion the subdistricts to be as nearly equal in
318 population as practicable. After the commission divides the
319 school district or reapportions the subdistricts, the
320 commission shall notify the residents of the school district
321 as provided by law.
322 (b) Any resident of the school district who believes
323 the school district division commission has divided the
324 school district or reapportioned subdistricts in violation
325 of paragraph (a) of this subdivision may petition the
326 circuit court of the county in which the school district
327 exists for an order directing the commission to divide the
328 school district or reapportion the subdistricts as provided
329 in paragraph (a) of this subdivision. The petition shall be
330 submitted to the circuit court within ten business days of
331 the commission's notice provided in paragraph (a) of this
332 subdivision.

SB 839 29
333 (4) On the first day available for candidate filing
334 for the first [general municipal] election occurring after
335 the school district is divided as provided in this
336 subsection, any qualified resident who has or will have
337 resided in a subdistrict or at-large district for the year
338 immediately preceding the general municipal election day may
339 file as a candidate for election to the school board as a
340 member representing such subdistrict or at-large district.
341 At the end of the time available for candidate filing, if no
342 qualified resident of a subdistrict has filed as a candidate
343 in that subdistrict, the election authority shall extend the
344 time for candidate filing by seven additional days, and any
345 qualified resident of the school district who has or will
346 have resided in the school district for the year immediately
347 preceding the general municipal election day may file as a
348 candidate for election to the school board as a member
349 representing that subdistrict. No school district shall
350 require a candidate to submit a petition signed by the
351 registered voters of the school district as a method of
352 filing a declaration of candidacy. The election authority
353 shall determine the validity of all declarations of
354 candidacy.
355 (5) When the election is held [on the general
356 municipal election day], the seven candidates, one from each
357 of the subdistricts or at-large districts, who receive a
358 plurality of the votes cast by the voters of that
359 subdistrict shall be elected. Any candidate who is not a
360 subdistrict resident but qualifies as a candidate as a
361 school district resident as provided in subdivision (4) of
362 this subsection shall be elected by the voters of the school
363 district. Each member shall be elected to a term as

SB 839 30
364 provided in the final plan approved as provided in
365 subdivision (2) of this subsection.
366 (6) Each member shall serve until a successor is
367 elected or the member vacates the office. Any vacancy that
368 occurs before the end of the member's term shall be filled
369 as provided in section 162.261 or 162.471.
370 (7) Except for a member who is not a subdistrict
371 resident but is elected as a school district resident to
372 represent a subdistrict as provided in subdivision (4) of
373 this subsection, each member shall reside in the subdistrict
374 the member represents during the member's term.
375 (8) All other provisions applicable to school
376 districts that are not in conflict with this subsection
377 shall apply to school districts divided as provided in this
378 subsection.
379 6. No new plan for division of the school district
380 shall be proposed or adopted as provided in this section
381 sooner than five years after a division of the school
382 district as provided in this section.
162.601. 1. [Elected members of the board in office
on August 28, 1998, shall hold office for the length of term
for which they were elected, and any members appointed
pursuant to section 162.611 to fill vacancies left by
elected members in office on August 28, 1998, shall serve
for the remainder of the term to which the replaced member
was elected.
2. No board members shall be elected at the first
municipal election in an odd-numbered year next following
August 28, 1998.
3. Three board members shall be elected at the second
municipal election in an odd-numbered year next following
August 28, 1998, to serve four-year terms.

SB 839 31
4. Four board members shall be elected at the third
municipal election in an odd-numbered year next following
August 28, 1998, and two of such members shall be elected to
four-year terms and two of such members shall be elected to
three-year terms. For the two members elected at the
municipal election in 2006, the terms of such members shall
expire after their successors are elected and qualified
pursuant to subsection 6 of this section.
5. Beginning with the fourth municipal election in an
odd-numbered year next following August 28, 1998, and at
each succeeding municipal election in a year during which
board member terms expire, there shall be elected members of
the board of education, who shall assume the duties of their
office at the first regular meeting of the board of
education after their election, and who shall hold office
for four years, and until their successors are elected and
qualified.
6. For the two board members who are elected at the
municipal election in 2006, their successors thereafter
shall be elected at the general election in the year in
which their terms expire] All board members shall be elected
at elections held on the first Tuesday after the first
Monday in November of even-numbered years. For all board
members serving terms as of January 1, 2028, such terms
shall be modified in accordance with the provisions of
section 162.082. The term of every board member elected in
2028 or thereafter shall be four years.
[7.] 2. Members of the board of directors shall be
elected to represent seven subdistricts. The subdistricts
shall be established by the state board of education to be
compact, contiguous and as nearly equal in population as
practicable. The subdistricts shall be revised by the state

SB 839 32
board of education after each decennial census and at any
other time the state board determines that the district's
demographics have changed sufficiently to warrant
redistricting.
[8.] 3. A member shall reside in and be elected in the
subdistrict which the member is elected to represent.
Subdistrict 1 shall be comprised of wards 1, 2, 22 and 27.
Subdistrict 2 shall be comprised of wards 3, 4, 5 and 21.
Subdistrict 3 shall be comprised of wards 18, 19, 20 and
26. Subdistrict 4 shall be comprised of wards 6, 7, 17 and
28. Subdistrict 5 shall be comprised of wards 9, 10, 11 and
12. Subdistrict 6 shall be comprised of wards 13, 14, 16
and 25. Subdistrict 7 shall be comprised of wards 8, 15, 23
and 24.
162.821. The district secretary shall keep a record of
the proceedings of all [annual and special] elections of the
voters of the district and of the proceedings of the board
of education. He shall make copies of the election notices,
contracts with teachers, certificates and all other papers
relating to the business of the district, and securely keep
the same. He shall maintain a correct plat of the district
and shall promptly notify the department of elementary and
secondary education and the county clerk of each county
affected of all changes in the boundaries of the district.
He shall transmit to the county commission and to the state
department of elementary and secondary education, on or
before the fifteenth day of August in each year, a report
embracing the following items:
(1) The number of children, male and female, attending
the public schools during the year;
(2) Total number of days' attendance by all such
children;

SB 839 33
(3) The number of days the public schools of the
district have been maintained during the school year;
(4) The number of teachers employed, male and female,
and the wages per month of each;
(5) Estimated value of school property owned and
managed by the district;
(6) Assessed valuation of the district;
(7) Rate of school tax on the assessed valuation of
the district;
(8) Cash on hand at the beginning of the year;
(9) Tuition fees received and credited to the
teachers' fund of the district;
(10) Public funds received by county treasurer;
(11) District tax received by county (or township)
treasurer;
(12) Amount paid on teachers' wages;
(13) Amount paid for incidental expenses;
(14) Amount expended for purchasing site, erecting
schoolhouses, rent and repairs;
(15) Amount expended in cancelling bonded indebtedness
and paying interest on same;
(16) Amount expended for library;
(17) Cash on hand at the end of the year; and
(18) Such other information as may be required by the
state board of education.
162.825. Whenever there is presented to the state
board of education a petition signed by voters in each
district in the proposed special district equal in number in
each district to five percent of the number of votes cast
for school board members in the last [annual] school
election praying (a) that a special school district
embracing the entire area described in the petition be

SB 839 34
organized for the education and training of handicapped and
severely handicapped children and for vocational education
purposes; and (b) that a proposal be submitted to the voters
of the proposed district for the organization of the special
school district, the state board of education, unless
section 162.835 applies, shall, within thirty days of the
receipt of said petition, direct the board of education of
each school district comprising the proposed special
district to cause the proposal to be submitted to the voters
in each such district at the next [municipal] school board
member election or, if the next [annual] school board member
election is more than sixty days away, cause the proposal to
be submitted to the voters in each such district at a
special election called in accordance with law on a date set
by the state board of education. The election shall be
conducted in each school district comprising the proposed
special district in the manner provided by law for the
conducting of school district elections generally in
sections 162.351 and 162.601, unless a different procedure
is specifically provided in sections 162.670 to [162.995]
162.974.
162.865. The board members of a special school
district with a population of not more than one hundred
thousand persons shall be elected at large. The seven
receiving the largest number of votes shall be elected and
the three receiving the highest number of votes cast shall
be elected for terms of [three] six years each; the two
receiving the next highest number of votes cast shall be
elected for terms of [two] four years each; and the two
receiving the next highest number of votes cast shall be
elected for terms of [one year] two years each. [That part
of the year between the date of the election of board

SB 839 35
members and the municipal election day of the following year
is considered a full year in the terms of the members
elected.] Any board member elected after this initial
election shall serve a four-year term. All board members
shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified
and the state board of education shall issue certificates of
election to the board members elected.
162.867. 1. Board of education members of a special
school district with a population of more than one hundred
thousand persons in office on August 28, 1999, shall serve
the remainder of their terms and shall serve until their
successors are duly elected and qualified pursuant to this
section.
2. On and after August 28, 1999, each new member of a
board of education of a special school district with a
population of more than one hundred thousand persons shall
be elected pursuant to this section by the governing council
established pursuant to section 162.856.
3. Pursuant to this section, each qualified candidate
for the board of education of a special school district with
a population of more than one hundred thousand persons
shall:
(1) Be a voter of the district who has resided within
the state for one year next preceding selection to the board
and is resident in the subdistrict in which the candidate
files; and
(2) Be at least twenty-four years of age.
4. No member of the board of education of a special
school district with a population of more than one hundred
thousand persons shall:
(1) Vote on, solicit, transact, offer, or accept any
contract between the special school district and any

SB 839 36
corporation, partnership, association, or other organization
in which that member of the board of education has a
financial interest, unless otherwise provided herein,
excluding interests owned prior to such member's election;
(2) Hold any office or employment of profit from the
board of education of the special school district while
serving. However, nothing in this section shall be
construed to preclude a person from being elected to or
serving on the board of education of the special school
district on the basis that the person is related to a pupil
of the special school district or to a pupil of any school
district all or a portion of which is contained within the
special school district; or
(3) Vote on, solicit, transact, offer, or accept any
contract or procurement in which that board member shall
have a direct or indirect beneficial interest, unless:
(a) The material facts as to such member's
relationship or interest and as to the contract or
transaction are disclosed in writing and are known to the
board and governing council, and such governing council and
board, in good faith, authorize the contract or transaction
by the affirmative vote of the majority of the disinterested
members; and
(b) Such member's relationship or interest in such
contract or transaction shall not be voted upon by such
interested member.
5. [Beginning in April, 1997, and every third year
thereafter, two members shall be elected. Beginning in
April, 1998, and every third year thereafter, two members
shall be elected. Beginning in April, 1999, and every third
year thereafter, three members shall be elected] For all
board members serving terms as of January 1, 2028, such

SB 839 37
terms shall be modified in accordance with the provisions of
section 162.082. The term of every board member elected in
2028 or thereafter shall be four years. A member shall be
elected to fill each open seat on the board of education.
6. Board members elected in 2028 or thereafter shall
serve [three-year] four-year terms and shall serve until
their successors are duly elected and qualified.
7. The board of education shall, upon formation and
each decade within ninety days following the publication of
the final decennial census figures thereafter, adopt a
resolution calling for the formation of a redistricting
committee. Upon adoption of such resolution, the secretary
of the board of education shall forward a certified copy
thereof to the state board of education. The redistricting
committee shall consist of three residents within the
district, appointed by the board of education of the special
school district, plus three additional persons resident
within the special school district, appointed by the state
board of education. Thereafter, the redistricting committee
shall meet, organize itself with a chairman and secretary,
and proceed with the adoption of a redistricting plan. Any
plan proposed to be adopted must receive approval of a
majority of the whole redistricting committee. Upon
adoption, the redistricting committee shall forward a copy
of the plan certified by the secretary of the redistricting
committee to the state board of education for its approval
or disapproval. The state board of education shall approve
any redistricting plan which divides the special district
into seven subdistricts of equal population, taking into
account insofar as possible existing school district
boundary lines. Upon approval by the state board of
education, the redistricting plan shall become effective and

SB 839 38
all board members selected thereafter shall be selected from
subdistricts in which they are resident. If the plan is not
approved, then it shall be returned to the redistricting
committee for revision and resubmission. If a redistricting
plan has not been adopted within one year after the
publication of the decennial census figures, the state board
of education shall provide the redistricting plan. No
member of the redistricting committee shall serve on the
board of education for a period of six years following such
service on the redistricting committee.
100 8. The structure of the board of education and the
101 selection of members of the board of education of a special
102 school district with a population of more than one hundred
103 thousand persons shall be as established pursuant to this
104 section, except as may be otherwise approved by the voters
105 of the special school district under section 162.858.
162.910. At the elections conducted pursuant to
section 162.865, the voters of a special district with a
population of not more than one hundred thousand persons
shall elect, by ballot, two board members to succeed those
whose terms have expired and the board members so elected
shall hold office for terms of [three] four years and until
their successors have been elected and qualified and shall
assume the duties of their offices at the first regular
meeting of the board of education held after their
election. Candidates shall file their declarations of
candidacy for office of board member with the secretary of
the board of education of the special school district. A
majority of the then qualified members of the board of
education of the special school district shall certify the
candidates receiving the greatest number of votes for terms
of [three] four years each and until their successors shall

SB 839 39
have been elected and qualified, and shall declare and
certify the results of the vote cast on any question
presented at the election.
Section B. Section A of this act shall become
effective on January 1, 2028.
✓